Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 97.
[JOB CREATION, JOB EXPANSION, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT] (CONST., ART. 12, §
5, AMEND. 62, §§
1(b), 2, 5, 9, and AMEND. 82, AMENDED; CONST. AMEND. 62, §
3, REPEALED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 12, §
5, Amend. 62, §§ 1(b), 2, 5, 9, and Amend. 82, and repealed Amend. 62, §
3. The amendments are incorporated within those sections. Amendment 97 was proposed by S.J.R. 16 during the 2015 Regular Session and adopted at the 2016 general election by a vote of 689,980 for and 366,020 against. The amendment was effective December 8, 2016.

Amend. 97, § 1, provided: “INTENT. The intent of this amendment to the Arkansas Constitution is to encourage job creation, job expansion, and economic development.”

Amend. 97, § 9, provided: “SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this amendment are severable, and if any should be held invalid, the remainder shall stand.”

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.